lexd_components/hyx-nouns_paradigms.lexd
 
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!!  M O R P H O T A C T I C S  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

# I don't use zero affixes for nominative or accusative
# I don't separate syncretic genitive and dative
# Not making եան declension because obsolete
#Not making եաց class From Hagopian grammar

########################################
########################################
########################################
### NOUN PARADIGMS
########################################
########################################
########################################
########################################

# TO DO: add attributive morphology but it's really hard to know what its distribution is: Dum-Tragut 2009 page 553, and it's mostly limited to spoken speech
#TO DO: remove repetition in output like ամիսը by reorganizing declensions based on Number

#All the main declension systems
PATTERNS
OpenClassRegularNounDeclCanBeBare
OpenClassRegularNounDeclCantBeBare
NounDeclIrregularU
InfinitivalDecl


#suffix-based declensions
NounDeclUtjunSuffix
NounDeclUmSuffix

#Full-declension patterns
NounDeclIrregMonoWithN
NounDeclIrregularTimeVan
NounDeclOldOch
NounDeclOldFamilyOAblaut


# Dative+oblique only patterns
NounDeclOldAnForm
NounDeclFamilyNkForm
NounDeclOldRandomOAblaut
NounDeclCountry

#Irregular words
NounDeclIrregReduce
NounDeclIrregReducePoly


##########################
##########################

PATTERN OpenClassRegularNounDeclCanBeBare
#This is for bucket of nouns that get similar enough inflection
# This includes regular nouns,   names, and quantifiers that are nominalized even when bare
# postpositions
#This excludes irregular U, and infinitivals
#This excludes adverbs/adjectives and participles that are nominalized when non-bare


OpenClassRegularNounDeclCanBeBareStem NSg0 RegNounCaseIDeclensionWithOptDef
OpenClassRegularNounDeclCanBeBareStem RegPluralAndPluralPossessiveDeclension

PATTERN OpenClassRegularNounDeclCanBeBareStem
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundary
NounReg NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed # Dir/LR
DeclinablePostposition  NouNinflBoundary

# For names or proper nouns. Don't have the NouNInflBoundary to block glide deletion
#Country names  are in separate category because some of them take -ia suffix

NameBaseNotCountry NouNinflBoundary

# quantifiers and question words are explained in the pronoun lexd
Quantifier [<prn><qnt>:]
QuestionWords [<prn>:] ([<rel>:]|[<itg>:])
QuantifierQuestionWords [<prn><qnt>:] ([<itg>:])?
StrictQuestionWords [<prn><itg>:]

PATTERN NameBaseNotCountry
NameMaleGiven [<np><ant><m>:]
NameFemaleGiven [<np><ant><f>:]

NameFamily  [<np><cog>:]
NameGivenUnclassified [<np><ant>:]
NameNotGivenCountry [<np><al>:]




PATTERN RegNounCaseIDeclensionWithOptDef # singular
#This is for singular case/def inflection where both case and def are optional
#This is like regular nouns
CaseRegI? (Def|Poss)?
AttributiveGenIDef
AttributiveInst

PATTERN CaseDefUDeclension
#This is case/def slots where dative is -u
#Used by plurals and by irregular nouns
CaseRegU? (Def|Poss)?
AttributiveGenUDef
AttributiveInst


PATTERN RegNounPluralFormDeclension # plural
NPlReg CaseDefUDeclension


PATTERN PluralPossessiveDeclension # plural possessive
PossPl CaseRegPostPluralPoss? Def|Poss
InsReg PossPl  Def|Poss

PATTERN RegPluralAndPluralPossessiveDeclension
# plural
RegNounPluralFormDeclension
# plural possessive
NSg0|NPlReg PluralPossessiveDeclension
#Not doing combo of plural possessive and of attributive because weird

 

##########################
##########################
PATTERN OpenClassRegularNounDeclCantBeBare
#This is for bucket of words that get regular nominal inflection when not bare
# This includes  adverbs/adjectives and participles that are nominalized when non-bare
# interjctions, nubmers

OpenClassRegularNounDeclCantBeBareStem NSg0 RegNounCaseIDeclensionWithReqDef
OpenClassRegularNounDeclCantBeBareStem RegPluralAndPluralPossessiveDeclension

#For bookkeeping, I also have bare adjectives/adverbs here without any substantivization
AdjAdvBaseDegreed


PATTERN OpenClassRegularNounDeclCantBeBareStem
ParticipleDeclStem
AdjAdvDeclStem
DeclDeclinableInterjection SubstZero NouNinflBoundary
NumericalBase|CardinalFraction SubstZero  NouNinflBoundary
# NumericalBase|CardinalFraction SubstZero  NouNinflBoundaryRed # I don't think these reduce Dir LR
ClassicalOrdinals [<num><ord>:]  SubstZero  NouNinflBoundary
AdverbialPronounDeclinable AdvZero SubstZero  NouNinflBoundary

PATTERN ParticipleDeclStem
ParticipleInflectable SubstZero NouNinflBoundary
(:Neg ParticipleInflectable Neg:) SubstZero NouNinflBoundary

PATTERN ParticipleInflectable
ResultPart
SubjectPart
ProspectivePart

PATTERN AdjAdvDeclStem
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundary
AdjAdvBaseDegreed SubstZero NouNinflBoundaryRed # Dir/LR


PATTERN AdjAdvBaseDegreed
#Adj with or without superlative prefix
AdjAdvBaseSimple
:AdjSuper AdjAdvBaseSimple AdjSuper:

PATTERN AdjAdvBaseSimple
#Bare adjectives
AdjReg AdjZero
#Bare adverbs
AdvReg AdvZero

#Derived adverbs
AdjReg AdvOren
AdjReg NouNinflBoundaryRed AdvOren # Dir/LR





PATTERN RegNounCaseIDeclensionWithReqDef
#This is for singular case/def inflection where both either case or  def is required
#This is like substantivized nouns where the bare form is not interpreted as a noun
# without case
Def|Poss
# with case, with/without definite
CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?
# attributive
AttributiveGenIDef
AttributiveInst

##########################
##########################


PATTERN NounDeclIrregularU
#This is for nouns and function words that take u-declension
#This don't have high vowels that can reduce
#This is a closet set of nouns
# Does not include infinitivals because infinitivals cant be bare
#Singular
UNounStemBoundary NSg0 CaseDefUDeclension
UNounStemBoundary NSg0 DatGenRegI (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR
NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR



#Plural
UNounStemBoundary RegPluralAndPluralPossessiveDeclension
NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst  # Dir/LR

PATTERN UNounStemBoundary
NounIrregU NZero NouNinflBoundary
Number1 [<num>:]  SubstZero  NouNinflBoundary
QuantifierU  [<prn><qnt>:] 


##########################
##########################

PATTERN InfinitivalDecl
#For declined infinitivals, I assume they're not pluralized
#I don't add the reduction boundary as a safety precaution
#I make bare infinitival get analyezd as just a verb
#TO DO: I don't think they can take attributive, but I put them here just to be safe

#Singular caseless definite and attributive
InfinitivalDeclStem  NSg0 DeclUWithFixedDef
#Plural possessive
InfinitivalDeclStem   PluralPossessiveDeclension


PATTERN InfinitivalDeclStem
Infinitival
:Neg Infinitival Neg:


PATTERN DeclUWithFixedDef
#This is case-def where dative is -u and the noun can't be bare, like an infinitival
Def|Poss
CaseRegU (Def|Poss)?
AttributiveGenUDef
AttributiveInst



######################
######################



PATTERN NounTimeVanAdvStem
NounTimeVanAdv AdvZero

PATTERN NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem
NounTimeVanAdvStem SubstZero NouNinflBoundary
[երբ<prn>:երբ] ([<rel>:]|[<itg>:])   SubstZero NouNinflBoundary 


PATTERN NounTimeVanStem
NounTimeVan NZero NouNinflBoundary
NounTimeVanU NZero NouNinflBoundary

PATTERN NounDeclIrregularTimeVan
#optional normal case
#Have to add noun-boundary before definite too in order to trigger glide deletion
#ժամ takes the above and dative ու

NounTimeVanStem NSg0 CaseTimeVan? NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)? 
NounTimeVanStem NSg0 RegNounCaseIDeclensionWithOptDef  # Dir/LR
NounTimeVanU  NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenRegU (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR
#sometimes see words like շատոնցմէ where get regular inflection but case-boundary M
NounTimeVanStem NSg0 CaseBoundaryM CaseRegOblique (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR


#Singular attributive
#The ուանէ form is preferably treated as attributive
NounTimeVanStem NSg0 AttributiveVan
NounTimeVanU 	 			NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst   # Dir/LR


#Plural
NounTimeVanStem RegPluralAndPluralPossessiveDeclension



#For irregulars among the time words
#For irregulars derived from adverbs like այսօր
#Bare adverb
NounTimeVanAdvStem
#Without case, but with definite
NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)
#With case
NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem NSg0 CaseTimeVan NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)? 
NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR
#with possible case-boundary m like շատոնցմէ
NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem NSg0 CaseBoundaryM CaseRegOblique (Def|Poss)?  # Dir/LR


#Attributive
NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem NSg0 AttributiveVan

#Plural
NounTimeVanAdvNominalizedStem RegPluralAndPluralPossessiveDeclension

#For irregular հիմակուան from հիմա
NounTimeVanHima AdvZero
NounTimeVanHima [:կ] AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVan NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)? 

#singular attributive
NounTimeVanHima [:կ] AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveVan


#Plural possessive (separate line for instrumental)
NounTimeVanHima [:կուան] AdvZero SubstZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0|NPlReg PluralPossessiveDeclension


#For reduced forms իրիկուն իրիկուան
#For reduced forms շաբաթ շաբթուան շաբթուն
# I don't think we ever find մ boundary here, even in older texts

NounTimeVanReducedBase|NounTimeVanUReducedBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 (Def|Poss)? 

NounTimeVanReducedReduced|NounTimeVanUReducedReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseTimeVan NouNinflBoundary (Def|Poss)?
NounTimeVanReducedBase|NounTimeVanUReducedBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 CaseRegI (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR
NounTimeVanUReducedReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 DatGenRegU (Def|Poss)? # Dir/LR

#attributive
NounTimeVanReducedReduced|NounTimeVanUReducedReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveVan
NounTimeVanReducedBase|NounTimeVanUReducedBase NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst # Dir/LR
NounTimeVanUReducedReduced NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 AttributiveGenUDef|AttributiveInst # Dir/LR

 
#Plural
NounTimeVanReducedBase|NounTimeVanUReducedBase NZero NouNinflBoundary RegPluralAndPluralPossessiveDeclension


#############################
#############################
#############################
#############################
#Other irregulars

PATTERN NounDeclIrregReducePoly
#For nouns which reduce when they take irregular inflection
#But don't reduce when take normal inflection
#right now just գլուխ because ամիս can go under the -van words
#I take the -u form as less prefered
#Singular
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 RegNounCaseIDeclensionWithOptDef
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 RegNounCaseIDeclensionWithOptDef   # Dir/LR
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NSg0 CaseDefUDeclension   # Dir/LR

#Because polysyllabic, no need for reduction boundary
#Plural
NounIrregUReducePoly NZero  NouNinflBoundary RegPluralAndPluralPossessiveDeclension



#############################
PATTERN NounDeclIrregMonoWithN
#These are for nouns which are monosyllabic but take ներ, whether descriptively or prescriptively

#For nouns which take ներ prescriptively but not in practice
#I give a special diacritic in the plural -ner so that it can trigger reduction
#Singular մուկ մուկէ մկնէ 
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NSg0 RegNounCaseIDeclensionWithOptDef
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer NSg0 NominalNasalN? CaseRegI (Def|Poss)?   # Dir/LR

#attributive
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer NSg0 NominalNasalN? AttributiveGenIDef|AttributiveInst   # Dir/LR

#Plural
#մուկեր
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary NPlReg CaseDefUDeclension
#մկեր
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundaryRed NPlReg CaseDefUDeclension  # Dir/LR
#մուկներ մկներ
NounIrregMonoNerOld NZero NouNinflBoundary|NouNinflBoundaryRedForcedNer NPlNerOnly CaseDefUDeclension    # Dir/LR
